Texas statutes.
PARKS AND WILDLIFE CODE

TITLE 7. LOCAL AND SPECIAL LAWS

CHAPTER 114. BELL COUNTY

SUBCHAPTER B. STILLHOUSE HOLLOW RESERVOIR

Sec. 114.011. HUNTING PROHIBITED. (a) Except as provided by Subsection (b) of this section, no person on the water of Stillhouse Hollow Reservoir in Bell County or on land that is owned by the federal government and that is adjacent to Stillhouse Hollow Reservoir may hunt any wild bird or animal.

(b) A person may hunt birds on the water of Stillhouse Hollow Reservoir in Bell County or on land that is owned by the federal government and that is adjacent to Stillhouse Hollow Reservoir during the open season only if:

(1) the person is at least 600 feet from the nearest private property line when the person shoots the gun; and

(2) the person uses a shotgun.

(c) Repealed by Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 267, art. 4, Sec. 16, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Added by Acts 1981, 67th Leg., p. 2102, ch. 486, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 31, 1981. Amended by Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 267, art. 4, Sec. 16, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.